New York, session 2025-2026, A9166.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 602 of the general business law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 4 to read as follows: 3 4. A debtor shall have a private right of action against any person or 4 persons in violation of this article. Such person or persons shall be 5 liable to the debtor for any actual damages the debtor sustained as a 6 result of the violation of this article, any punitive damages awarded by 7 the court, and reasonable attorney's fees. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 9 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01799-01-5